South Dakota, session 2026, SB106.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 13-37-40 be AMENDED:
13-37-40. Subject to the limitations provided below and in § 13-37-42, the
secretary of the Department of Education shall, beginning July 1, 2026, set aside five
million dollars of the state aid to districts for special education appropriation for
extraordinary expenses incurred in providing special education programs or services to
children with disabilities, with expenditures to be made as provided in § 13-37-60.
Any funds not expended or obligated pursuant to this section are not subject to
reversion pursuant to § 4-8-19, provided that the total amount reserved each year for
extraordinary expenses does not exceed five million five hundred thousand dollars.

26.434.11 2 106
An Act to modify the amount required to be set aside for extraordinary expenses incurred in
providing special education programs.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 106
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 106 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB106 ENROLLED